North Carolina, session 2025, SB176.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Mitchell
County Sheriff's Office and the Yancey County Sheriff's Office may enter into memorandums of
understanding with the Unicoi County, Tennessee, Sheriff's Office to engage across state lines in
law enforcement special operations missions and cooperative law enforcement actions.
SECTION 1.(b) Any memorandum of understanding entered into pursuant to this
section shall specify the manner in which liability claims for damage to persons or property as a
result of law enforcement special operations missions and cooperative law enforcement actions
will be shared or assigned. While ensuring public safety, each memorandum of understanding
shall limit to the greatest extent possible the liability of Mitchell County, Yancey County, and
the State.
SECTION 2. No later than November 1 of each year, any memorandum of
understanding entered into that year pursuant to this act shall be reported to the Department of
Justice.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S176-v-3*